Maryland, session 2026, HB1534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
TITLE 19. DATA CENTERS.
19–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX –
GENERAL ARTICLE.
(C) “DBA” MEANS DECIBELS OF SOUND AS DETERMINED BY THE
A–WEIGHTING NETWORK.
(D) “DBC” MEANS DECIBELS OF SOUND AS DETERMINED BY THE
C–WEIGHTING NETWORK.
19–102.
(A) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
REQUIREMENTS, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A DATA CENTER SHALL:
(1) IF THE DATA CENTER IS LOCATED WITHIN A 2,500–FOOT RADIUS
OF THE BOUNDARY OF A PRIMARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL PROPERTY:
(I) ENSURE ELECTRICAL SUBSTATIONS AND OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINES THAT HAVE A VOLTAGE CARRYING CAPACITY IN EXCESS OF 69

HOUSE BILL 1534 3
KILOVOLTS MAINTAIN A MINIMUM 1,000–FOOT SETBACK FROM ANY PLAYGROUND
OR ATHLETIC FIELD ON THE SCHOOL PROPERTY;
(II) BEFORE OPERATING THE DATA CENTER AND ON REQUEST
FROM A SCHOOL, PROVIDE:
1. FOR THE INSTALLATION OF HEPA–ONLY FILTERS
AND MERV 13+ FILTERS IN THE SCHOOL’S HEATING, VENTILATION, AND
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM; AND
2. FUNDING FOR ANNUAL COSTS RELATED TO
MAINTAINING AND REPLACING THE FILTERS; AND
(III) INSTALL AND MAINTAIN A PUBLIC–FACING AIR QUALITY
SENSOR NETWORK AT THE AIR INTAKES OF THE SCHOOL TO MONITOR PARTICULATE
MATTER 2.5, NITROGEN DIOXIDE, AND CARBON MONOXIDE; AND
(2) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH BY REGULATION SOUND
AND VIBRATION CONTROLS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR BACKUP POWER GENERATION
FOR DATA CENTERS.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) SET SOUND LEVEL LIMITS THAT PROHIBIT DBC FROM
EXCEEDING DBA BY MORE THAN 10 DECIBELS OF SOUND; AND
(II) FOR SCHOOL AND RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, SET SOUND
LEVEL LIMITS THAT MAY NOT EXCEED:
1. 45 DBA; OR
2. 55 DBC;
(III) SET PEAK PARTICLE VELOCITY LIMITS THAT MAY NOT
EXCEED 0.02 INCHES PER SECOND AT ANY SCHOOL FOUNDATION;
(IV) REQUIRE ALL MECHANICAL EQUIPMENT TO USE
SPRING–ISOLATED FOUNDATIONS WITH 95% EFFICIENCY;

HOUSE BILL 1534
(V) REQUIRE EACH BACKUP GENERATOR WITHIN 1 MILE OF
THE BOUNDARY OF A SCHOOL OR RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY TO MEET TIER 4
EMISSION STANDARDS AND CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY;
(VI) FOR A DATA CENTER THAT REQUIRES MORE THAN 50
MEGAWATTS, REQUIRE ON–SITE BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE; AND
(VII) PROHIBIT NONEMERGENCY BACKUP GENERATOR TESTING
BETWEEN THE HOURS OF 7:30 A.M. AND 4:30 P.M., MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY.
(C) A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT OR THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE AN
EMERGENCY STOP WORK ORDER IF:
(1) ANY SOUND OR VIBRATION LIMIT SET FOR SCHOOL PROPERTY BY
THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION IS EXCEEDED FOR MORE THAN 4 HOURS DURING
SCHOOL HOURS; OR
(2) AN AIR QUALITY MONITOR DETECTS AN INCREASE OF 20% OR
MORE IN POLLUTANTS DURING BACKUP GENERATOR TESTING.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY OF $10,000.
(2) IN ADDITION TO A PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, IF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A DATA CENTER HAS VIOLATED
THIS SECTION MULTIPLE TIMES, THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE OR SUSPEND ANY
PERMIT ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO THE DATA CENTER UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Land Use
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(27) TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 6 (DATA CENTER SITING);
[(27)] (28) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (29) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);

HOUSE BILL 1534 5
[(29)] (30) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (31) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (32) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (33) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
SUBTITLE 6. DATA CENTER SITING.
7–601.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
7–602.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL APPROVING
AUTHORITY MAY NOT AUTHORIZE CONSTRUCTION OF A DATA CENTER:
(1) ON LAND WITH SOILS CLASSIFIED AS U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE SOIL CAPABILITY CLASS I OR CLASS II UNLESS THERE IS NO OTHER
LAND IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT IS AVAILABLE AND CLASSIFIED AS AN
INDUSTRIAL ZONE;
(2) ON LAND ENCUMBERED BY AN AGRICULTURAL EASEMENT;
(3) IN A RURAL LEGACY AREA, AS DEFINED IN § 5–9A–02 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; OR
(4) IF CONSTRUCTION OF THE DATA CENTER WOULD RESULT IN A
VIOLATION OF TITLE 19 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) BEFORE A LOCAL APPROVING AUTHORITY MAY APPROVE AN
APPLICATION FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A DATA CENTER ON LAND THAT HAS NOT
BEEN PREVIOUSLY DEVELOPED, AN APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE LOCAL
APPROVING AUTHORITY A REPORT THAT VERIFIES THAT THE APPLICANT
EVALUATED DECOMMISSIONED INDUSTRIAL OR POWER PLANT SITES BEFORE
SUBMITTAL OF THE APPLICATION.

HOUSE BILL 1534
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.